New York, session 2025-2026, A8443.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The social services law is amended by adding a new section 2 152-e to read as follows: 3 § 152-e. Public availability of information regarding waiver requests 4 and shelter and rental supplements. 1. For purposes of this section, the 5 following terms shall have the following meanings: 6 (a) "Office" shall mean the office of temporary and disability assist- 7 ance. 8 (b) "Waiver" means permission to deviate from a state or federal 9 program rule or statutory provision. 10 (c) "Shelter supplement plan" means a plan submitted by a social 11 services district for approval by the department to provide additional 12 monthly shelter supplements to public assistance applicants and recipi- 13 ents as provided in 18 NYCRR 352.3. 14 (d) "Rental supplement program plan" means any plan submitted by a 15 social services district for approval by the office to provide rental 16 assistance to individuals who are experiencing homelessness or are 17 facing imminent loss of housing. 18 2. The office shall make publicly available information regarding 19 waivers and rental supplement plans and shelter supplement plans by 20 providing, at a minimum, the following information: 21 (a) Within sixty days of the effective date of this section, the 22 office shall post on its website a compendium of existing waivers of 23 state or federal program rules or statutory provisions, including but EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07490-01-5 A. 8443 2 1 not limited to a description of the state or federal program rule or 2 statutory provision waived, the date first granted, the date the waiver 3 will expire if any, and the social services districts to which the waiv- 4 er applies. The office shall review existing waivers at least once every 5 five years to analyze the continued need for existing waivers and shall 6 publish the results of the review and make it available to the public 7 for comment. 8 (b) Within ten days after a federal agency has provided notice of an 9 available federal waiver, the office shall post on its website the rele- 10 vant information about such available federal waiver including a summary 11 of such available waiver and a citation or link to the appropriate 12 federal authority for such available federal waiver. Any waiver request 13 submitted by the office to any federal agency shall be made publicly 14 available on the website of the office no later than ten days after the 15 request is submitted. Any approval or denial of such requests shall be 16 made available on the website of the office no later than ten days after 17 receipt. 18 (c) The office shall provide notice of waivers of state or federal 19 program rules or statutory provisions which may be requested by social 20 services districts. Within ten days after the office has provided notice 21 that a waiver may be requested by a social services district, the office 22 shall post on its website the relevant information about such available 23 waiver including a summary of such available waiver and a citation or 24 link to the appropriate authority for such available waiver. Any waiver 25 request submitted by a social services district to the office shall be 26 made publicly available on the website of the office no later than ten 27 days after the request is submitted to the office. Any approval or 28 denial of such requests shall be made available on the website of the 29 office no later than ten days after receipt. 30 (d) Any shelter supplement plan and any rental supplement program plan 31 submitted to the office by a social services district shall be made 32 publicly available on the website of the office no later than ten days 33 after such plan is submitted. Any approval or denial of such requests in 34 addition to any guidance issued related to such requests shall be made 35 publicly available on the website of the office no later than ten days 36 after issuance. 37 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.